Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 103. A. It shall not be necessary to publish a legal
notice, when published in a daily newspaper or in a semiweekly
newspaper, in every issue thereof, but it shall be sufficient to
publish such notice one (1) day each week during the required period
of publication. Said one (1) day of publishing legal notice each
week may be any day of the week in which the newspaper is published
but the said legal notice must appear in said newspaper on the same
day each week during the required period of publication as it was
originally published.

Req. No. 11683 Page 1

B. Legal notices, within the meaning of this act, shall include
all notices, the publication of which is provided for by some law of
the State of Oklahoma.
C. It shall be sufficient for county governments to post legal
notices to their public website, if available, for any legal notice
that has a statutory requirement of newspaper publication. Legal
notices shall be displayed for the same required period of
publication as for legal notices in newspaper publication. Legal
notices shall be located on a dedicated webpage for legal notices
and shall be easily identifiable and accessible from the county
website homepage.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11683 MJ 01/03/25










Req. No. 11683 Page 2